Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-352
Nebraska Outdoor Recreation Development
Cash Fund; disbursements; commission; multiyear recreational development plan.

(1) No appropriation shall be made from the Nebraska Outdoor Recreation
Development Cash Fund until the commission has presented electronically a multiyear recreational development
plan to the Legislature for its review, modification, and final approval.
An updated version of such plan shall also be submitted electronically to the Legislature annually for
its modification and approval. The money in such fund shall be administered
according to this section by the commission for the development, operation,
and maintenance of areas of the state park system. The money in such fund
may be used in whole or in part for the matching of federal funds. All disbursements
from the fund shall be made upon warrants drawn by the Director of Administrative
Services.

(2) When a recreational plan is prepared for any state park system area
or part of a state park system area cooperatively managed by the commission
and the Nebraska State Historical Society, such plan shall insure that adequate
funds are appropriated to develop and maintain historical aspects.

Laws 1978, LB 109, § 5;

Laws 1989, LB 18, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-1304;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 110;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 36.